North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 6A. Motorcycle Safety Instruction.

§ 115D-72.
Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program.

There is created a Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program for the purpose of establishing statewide motorcycle safety instruction to be delivered through the Community Colleges System Office. The Program may be administered by a motorcycle safety coordinator who shall be responsible for the planning, curriculum, and completion requirements of the Program. The State Board of Community Colleges may elect a motorcycle safety coordinator upon nomination of the President of the Community College System, and the compensation of the motorcycle safety coordinator shall be fixed by the State Board upon recommendation of the President of the Community College System pursuant to

G.S. 115D-3

. The State Board of Community Colleges may contract with an appropriate public or private agency or person to carry out the duties of the motorcycle safety coordinator.

The Motorcycle Safety Instruction Program shall be implemented through the Community Colleges System Office at institutions which choose to provide the Program. The motorcycle safety coordinator shall select and facilitate the training and certification of instructors who will implement the Program.

History.

1989, c. 755, s. 1; 1993, c. 320, s. 5; 1999-84, s. 15.

§§ 115D-73 through 115D-76.

Reserved for future codification purposes.